src/scripts/Spanish/stress.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024-2025  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# One of references that helped a lot: https://www.reddit.com/r/Spanish/comments/1336w1x/stress_pattern_on_espa%C3%B1ol/

define StressedVowel [a1 | e1 | i1 | o1 | u1] ; 
define UnstressedVowel a0|e0|i0|o0|u0 ; 
define StressedDhipthong i1 | u1 ;
define UnstressedDhipthong i0 | u0 ;
define vowel  UnstressedVowel  | StressedVowel ; 
define dhipthong  UnstressedDhipthong  | StressedDhipthong ; 
define pc   \vowel ; 
define pcd   \dhipthong ; 
define Consonant b|bh|c|ts|d|dh|f|g|gh|x|j|k|l|ll|m|ni|p|r|rr|sh|t|v|vh|w|{ks}|y|yc|zh ; 
define ConsonantNS b|bh|c|ts|d|dh|f|g|gh|x|j|k|l|ll|m|n|ni|p|r|rr|s|sh|t|v|vh|w|{ks}|y|yc|zh ; 
define noStress UnstressedVowel | pc ; 
define noStressD UnstressedDhipthong | pcd | StressMark ; 
define stresses 
[a0:a1|
e0:e1|
i0:i1|
o0:o1|
u0:u1] ; 

define openStressess 
[a0:a1|
e0:e1|
o0:o1] ;

define closeStresses 
[i0:i1|
u0:u1] ; 

define dhipthongStress openStressess @-> || 
# Explanation: we stress dhipthongs, (au, eu, ou) and (ai, ei, oi) putting the stress in the first long vowel (a, e or o) For example: pausa, leudar, fraile, aire.
#.#. noStressD* _ UnstressedDhipthong ConsonantNS* UnstressedVowel (n|s) .#. ;
.#. noStressD* _ UnstressedDhipthong ConsonantNS* .#., .#. noStressD* _ UnstressedDhipthong ConsonantNS* UnstressedVowel (n|s) .#. ;

define MonosylStress stresses -> || 
# Monosyllables in spanish always have the stress in the only one vowel between first consonants, and last consonants.
.#. ConsonantNS+ _ ConsonantNS* .#. ,, 
# Also, monosyllables can start with a vowel, ann more than one consonant. Let's put two.
.#. _ ConsonantNS .#. , .#. _ ConsonantNS^2 .#. ; 

define SpanishStress stresses -> || 
# In words that end in a vowel, n or s, the stress generally falls on the penultimate syllable.
.#. noStress* _ pc* UnstressedVowel (n|s) .#. ; 

define SpanishStress2 stresses -> || 
# If a word ends with a consonant, the stress falls in the last vowel of the syllable. Example, Español.
.#. noStress+ noStress+ _ ConsonantNS* .#. ; 

define unstress [
a:a0|
e:e0|
i:i0|
o:o0|
u:u0
] @-> || _ ;
